Mississippi, session 2026, HB563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-29-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-111.  (1)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall administer this article and shall work in conjunction and cooperation with the State Board of Pharmacy, county and municipal law enforcement agencies, the district and county attorneys, the Office of the Attorney General and the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics.  The State Board of Health shall work with the bureau in an advisory capacity and shall be responsible for recommending to the Legislature the appropriate schedule for all substances to be scheduled or rescheduled in Sections 41-29-113 through 41-29-121. In making a recommendation regarding a substance, the State Board of Health shall consider the following: (a)  (i)  The actual or relative potential for abuse; (ii)  The scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if known; (iii)  The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance; (iv)  The history and current pattern of abuse; (v)  The scope, duration and significance of abuse; (vi)  The risk to the public health; (vii)  The potential of the substance to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability; and (viii)  Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this article. (b)  After considering the factors enumerated in paragraph (a), the State Board of Health shall make findings with respect thereto and issue a recommendation to control the substance if it finds the substance has a potential for abuse. (c)  If the State Board of Health designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances that are precursors of the controlled precursor shall not be recommended for control solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor. (d)  If any substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal law and notice thereof is given to the State Board of Health, it shall recommend the control of the substance under this article at the next session of the Legislature. (e)  (i)  Authority to control under this article does not extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco as those terms are defined or used in the Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control Law, being Sections 67-1-1 through 67-1-91, and the Tobacco Tax Law of 1934, being Sections 27-69-1 through 27-69-77.  It is the intent of the Legislature of the State of Mississippi that the bureau shall concentrate its efforts and resources on the enforcement of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law with respect to illicit narcotic and drug traffic in the state. (ii)  The controlled substances listed in the schedules in Sections 41-29-113 through 41-29-121 are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical or trade name designated. (f)  The State Board of Health shall recommend the exclusion of any nonnarcotic substance from a schedule if such substance may, under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and the laws of this state, be lawfully sold over the counter without a prescription. (2)  Any drug that is scheduled on the federal schedule for the purpose of preventing or treating COVID-19 is automatically scheduled on the corresponding state schedule in Sections 41-29-113 through 41-29-121.  This automatic scheduling is effective from the date that the COVID-19-related drug is designated on the federal schedule until the effective date of legislation amending the corresponding state schedule in the next regular session of the Legislature. (3)  Not withstanding any law to the contrary, any pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and is then scheduled by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration is automatically scheduled on the corresponding state schedule in Sections 41-29-113 through 41-29-121.  This automatic scheduling is effective from the date that the drug is designated on the federal schedule until the effective date of legislation amending the corresponding state schedule in the next regular legislative session of the Legislature. SECTION 2.  Section 41-29-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-113. SCHEDULE I (a)  Schedule I consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, that is listed in this section. (b)  Opiates.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide); (2)  Acetylmethadol; (3)  Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (4)  Acryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide), also known as acryloylfentanyl; (5)  AH-7921 (3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino) cyclohexylmethyl]benzamide); (6)  Allylprodine; (7)  Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol (levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM); (8)  Alphameprodine; (9)  Alphamethadol; (10)  Alpha′-methyl butyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide); (11)  Alpha-Methylfentanyl (N-[1-alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)piperidine); (12)  Alpha-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (13)  Benzethidine; (14) Betacetylmethadol; (15)  Beta-Hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (16)  Beta-Hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenylethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (17)  Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl (N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide); (18)  Betameprodine; (19)  Betamethadol; (20)  Beta-Methyl fentanyl (N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)propionamide), also known as β-methyl fentanyl; (21)  Beta'-Phenyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N,3-diphenylpropanamide), also known as β'-phenyl fentanyl or 3-phenylpropanoyl fentanyl; (22)  Betaprodine; (23)  Brorphine (1(1(1(4-bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4yl)1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-one); (24)  Butyrl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide); (25)  Clonitazene; (26)  Crotonyl fentanyl ((E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbut-2-enamide); (27)  Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide); (28)  Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide); (29)  Dextromoramide; (30)  Diampromide; (31) Diethylthiambutene; (32)  Difenoxin; (33)  Dimenoxadol; (34)  Dimepheptanol; (35)  2′,5′-dimethoxyfentanyl (N-1-2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide); (36) Dimethylthiambutene; (37)  Dioxaphetyl butyrate; (38)  Dipipanone; (39) Ethylmethylthiambutene; (40)  Etodesnitazene (2-2-4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine, also known as etazene; (41)  Etonitazene; (42)  Etoxeridine; (43)  Fentanyl carbamate (ethyl(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)(phenyl)carbamate); (44)  Fentanyl-related substances, meaning any substance not otherwise listed under another schedule and for which no exemption or approval is in effect under Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 USC 355] that is structurally related to fentanyl by one or more of the following modifications: (A)  Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle; (B)  Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups; (C)  Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups; (D)  Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle whether or not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; and/or (E)  Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group. (45)  4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide), also known as para-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl); (46)  2'-Fluoro ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-(1-(2-fluorophenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-(2-fluorophenyl) propionamide), also known as 2'-fluoro 2-fluorofentanyl; (47)  Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide); (48)  3-furanyl fentanyl (N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-3-carboxamide); (49)  Furethidine; (50)  Hydroxypethidine; (51)  Isobutyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide); (52)  Isotonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4 isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); (53)  Isovaleryl fentanyl (3-methyl-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide); (54)  Ketobemidone (including the optical and geometric isomers); (55)  Levomoramide; (56) Levophenacylmorphan; (57)  Meta-fluorofentanyl (N-3-fluorophenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide); (58)  Meta-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); (59)  Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (60)  4'-Methyl acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-(4-methylphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (61)  2-methyl AP237 (1-2-methyl-4-3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one; (62)  3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (63)  3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1- (2-thienylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (64)  Para-methoxyfuranyl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (65)  Metonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metonitazene); (66)  Morpheridine; (67)  MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine); (68)  MT-45 (1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine); (69)  N-pyrrolidino etonitazene 2-4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-2-pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole, also known as etonitazepyne; (70)  Noracymethadol; (71)  Norlevorphanol; (72)  Normethadone; (73)  Norpipanone; (74)  Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N- (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide); (75)  Ortho-Fluoroacryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acrylamide); (76)  Ortho-Fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide), also known as 2-fluorobutyryl fentanyl; (77)  Ortho-Fluorofentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide), also known as 2-fluorofentanyl; (78)  Ortho-fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-2-fluorophenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (79)  Ortho-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); (80)  Ortho-Methyl acetylfentanyl (N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide), also known as 2-methyl acetylfentanyl; (81)  Ortho-Methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) acetamide), also known as 2-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl; (82)  Para-Chloroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); (83)  Para-Fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide); (84)  Para-Fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl) -N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide); (85)  Para-Fluoro furanyl fentanyl N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N- (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (86)  Para-Methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide); (87)  Para-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-4-methylphenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide); (88)  Para-Methylfentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide), also known as 4-methylfentanyl); (89)  PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine); (90)  Phenadoxone; (91)  Phenampromide; (92)  Phenomorphan; (93)  Phenoperidine; (94)  Phenyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbenzamide), also known as benzoyl fentanyl; (95)  Piritramide; (96)  Proheptazine; (97)  Properidine; (98)  Propiram; (99)  Protonitazene N,N-diethyl-2-5-nitro-2-4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine; (100)  Racemoramide; (101) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2- carboxamide); (102)  Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]propanamide); (103)  Thiofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylthiophene-2-carboxamide), also known as 2-thiofuranyl fentanyl or thiophene fentanyl; (104)  Tilidine; (105)  Trimeperidine; (106)  U-47700, (3,4-dichloro-N- [2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide); (107)  Valeryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide). (c)  Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Acetorphine; (2) Acetyldihydrocodeine; (3)  Benzylmorphine; (4)  Codeine methylbromide; (5)  Codeine-N-Oxide; (6)  Cyprenorphine; (7)  Desomorphine; (8)  Dihydromorphine; (9)  Drotebanol; (10)  Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt); (11)  Heroin; (12)  Hydromorphinol; (13)  Methyldesorphine; (14) Methyldihydromorphine; (15) Monoacetylmorphine; (16)  Morphine methylbromide; (17)  Morphine methylsulfonate; (18)  Morphine-N-Oxide; (19)  Myrophine; (20)  Nicocodeine; (21)  Nicomorphine; (22)  Normorphine; (23)  Pholcodine; (24)  Thebacon. (d)  Hallucinogenic substances.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional, or geometric) and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Alpha-ethyltryptamine; (2)  4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; (3)  4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine; (4)  2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine; (5)  2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET); (6)  2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (2C-T-7); (7)  4-methoxyamphetamine; (8)  5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine; (9)  4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; (10)  3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine; (11)  3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA); (12)  3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA); (13)  N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hydroxy MDA, N-OHMDA, and N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine); (14)  3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine; (15)  5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT); (16)  Alpha-methyltryptamine (also known as AMT); (17)  Bufotenine; (18) Diethyltryptamine; (19) Dimethyltryptamine; (20)  5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT); (21)  Ibogaine; (22)  Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD); (23)  (A)  Marijuana (Hemp as defined and regulated under Sections 69-25-201 through 69-25-221 and Cannabidiol contained in a legend drug product approved by the Federal Food and Drug Administration or obtained under Section 41-29-136 are exempt under Schedule I); (B)  Hashish; (24)  Mescaline; (25)  Parahexyl; (26)  Peyote; (27)  N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; (28)  N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; (29)  Psilocybin; (30)  Psilocyn; (31) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as the synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of such plant, and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant such as the following: (A)  1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol; (B)  6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol; (C)  3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol. (Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of atomic positions, are covered.) ("Tetrahydrocannabinols" excludes dronabinol and nabilone.)  For purposes of this paragraph, tetrahydrocannabinols do not include hemp or hemp products regulated under Sections 69-25-201 through 69-25-221. However, the following products are exempted from control: (i)  THC-containing industrial products made from cannabis stalks (e.g., paper, rope and clothing); (ii) Processed cannabis plant materials used for industrial purposes, such as fiber retted from cannabis stalks for use in manufacturing textiles or rope; (iii)  Animal feed mixtures that contain sterilized cannabis seeds and other ingredients (not derived from the cannabis plant) in a formula designed, marketed and distributed for nonhuman consumption; (iv)  Personal care products that contain oil from sterilized cannabis seeds, such as shampoos, soaps, and body lotions (if the products do not cause THC to enter the human body); (v)  Hemp as regulated under Sections 69-25-201 through 69-25-221; and (vi)  Any product derived from the hemp plant designed for human ingestion and/or consumption that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration; (32)  Phencyclidine; (33)  Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine (PCE); (34)  Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine (PHP, PCPy); (35)  Thiophene analog of phencyclidine; (36)  1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine (TCPy); (37)  4-methylmethcathinone (mephedrone); (38)  3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); (39)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E); (40)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-D); (41)  2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-C); (42)  2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-I); or 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine; (43)  2-[4-(ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-2); (44)  2-[4-(isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-4); (45)  2-(2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-H); (46)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (2C-N); (47)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-P); (48)  3,4-methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone(methylone); (49)  2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25B-NBOMe; 2C-B-NBOMe; 25B; Cimbi-36); (50)  2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25C-NBOMe; 2C-C-NBOMe; 25C; Cimbi-82); (51)  2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine or N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (25I-NBOMe; 2C-I-NBOMe; 25I; Cimbi-5); (52)  7-bromo-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1, 4-benzodiazepin-2-one (also known as Phenazepam); (53)  7-(2-chlorophenyl)-4-ethyl-13-methyl-3-thia-1,8, 11,12-tetraazatricyclo[8.3.0.0]trideca-2(6),4,7,10,12-pentaene (also known as Etizolam); (54)  Salvia divinorum; (55)  Synthetic cannabinoids.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of a synthetic cannabinoid found in any of the following chemical groups, whether or not substituted to any extent, or any of those groups which contain any synthetic cannabinoid salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation, including all synthetic cannabinoid chemical analogues in such groups: (A)  (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6, 6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c] chromen-1-ol (also known as HU-210 or 1,1-dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxy-delta8-tetrahydrocannabinol); (B) Naphthoylindoles and naphthylmethylindoles, being any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent, or in the naphthyl ring to any extent; (C) Naphthoylpyrroles, being any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole, whether or not substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, or in the naphthyl ring to any extent; (D) Naphthylmethylindenes, being any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene, whether or not substituted in the indene ring to any extent or in the naphthyl ring to any extent; (E) Phenylacetylindoles, being any compound structurally derived from 3-phenylacetylindole, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or in the phenyl ring to any extent; (F) Cyclohexylphenols, being any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol, whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent or in the phenolic ring to any extent; (G) Benzoylindoles, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or in the phenyl ring to any extent; (H) Adamantoylindoles, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or in the adamantoyl ring system to any extent; (I)  Tetrahydro derivatives of cannabinol and 3-alkyl homologues of cannabinol or of its tetrahydro derivatives, except where contained in cannabis or cannabis resin; (J)  3-Cyclopropylmethanone indole or 3-Cyclobutylmethanone indole or 3-Cyclopentylmethanone indole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the cyclopropyl, cyclobutyl or cyclopentyl rings to any extent; (K)  Quinolinyl ester indoles, being any compound structurally derived from 1H-indole-3carboxylic acid-8-quinolinyl ester, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or the quinolone ring to any extent; (L)  3-carboxamide-1H-indazoles, whether or not substituted in the indazole ring to any extent and substituted to any degree on the carboxamide nitrogen and 3-carboxamide-1H-indoles, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent and substituted to any degree on the carboxamide nitrogen; (M) Cycloalkanemethanone Indoles, whether or not substituted at the nitrogen atom on the indole ring, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the cycloalkane ring to any extent; (56)  Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate, also known as NM2201 or CBL2201; (57)  1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H- pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-carboxamide, also known as 5F-CUMYL-P7AICA or SGT-25; (58)  Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobutyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, also known as 4F-MDMB-BINACA or 4F-MDMB-BUTINACA); (59)  1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-methylpropan-2-amine, also known as para-methoxymethamphetamine or PMMA; (60)  Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl) -1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, also known as 5F-EDMB-PINACA; (61)  Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, also known as 5F-MDMB-PICA or 5F-MDMB-2201; (62)  N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, also known as FUB-AKB48 or FUB-APINACA or AKB48 N-(4-fluorobenzyl); (63)  (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, also known as FUB-144; (64)  N-ethylhexedrone, also known as α-ethylaminohexanophenone or 2-(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one; (65)  Alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone, also known as α-PHP or α-pyrrolidinohexanophenone or 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one); (66)  4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone, also known as 4-MEAP or 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-methylphenyl)pentan-1-one); (67)  4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, also known as MPHP or 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone or 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one); (68)  Alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone (also known as PV8; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one); (69)  4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone, also known as 4-chloro-α-PVP or 4'-chloro-α-pyrrolidinopentiophenone or 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one); (70)  2-(ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexan-1-one, also known as methoxetamine or MXE; (71) Zipeprol (1-methoxy-3-[4-(2-methoxy-2-phenylethyl)piperazin-1-yl]-1-phenylpropan-2-ol); (72)  Eutylone (1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)butan-1-one); and (73)  ADBBUTINACA N-1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. (e)  Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Clonazolam, 6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine; (2)  Flualprazolam, 8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine; (3)  Flubromazepam, 7-bromo-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one; (4)  Flubromazolam, 8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepin; (5)  Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (other names include:  GHB, gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate); (6)  Mecloqualone; (7)  Methaqualone. (f)  Stimulants.  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following central nervous system stimulants including optical salts, isomers and salts of isomers unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule: (1)  Aminorex; (2)  Amineptine (7-[(10,11-dihydro-5H-dibenzo[a,d]cyclohepten-5-yl)amino]heptanoic acid); (3)  N-benzylpiperazine (also known as BZP and 1-benzylpiperazine); (4)  Cathinone; (5)  4,4'-Dimethylaminorex, also known as 4,4'-DMAR or 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol-2-amine); (6)  Fenethylline; (7)  Mesocarb (N-phenyl-N' -(3-(1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3- ium-5-yl)carbamimidate); (8)  Methcathinone; (9)  Methiopropamine (N-methyl-1-(thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-amine)); (10)  4-methylaminorex (also known as 2-amino-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline); (11)  N-ethylamphetamine; (12)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of N,N-dimethylamphetamine. (Other names include:  N,N,-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine and N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine); (13)  Synthetic cathinones.  (A)  Unless listed in another schedule, any compound other than bupropion that is structurally derived from 2-Amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone by modification in any of the following ways: (i) By substitution in the phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, alkylenedioxy, haloalkyl or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the phenyl ring by one or more other univalent substituents; (ii) By substitution at the 3-position with an alkyl substituent; (iii) By substitution at the nitrogen atom with alkyl or dialkyl groups, or by inclusion of the nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure. (B)  The compounds covered in this paragraph (10) include, but are not limited to, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of a synthetic cathinone found in any of the following compounds, whether or not substituted to any extent, or any of these compounds which contain any synthetic cathinone, or salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers or salts of isomers is possible, unless specifically excepted or listed in another schedule: (i)  4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone ("4-MEC"); (ii)  4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone ("4-MePPP"); (iii)  Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone ("α-PVP"); (iv)  1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- (methylamino)butan-1-one ("butylone"); (v)  2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpentan-1-one ("pentedrone"); (vi)  1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- (methylamino)pentan-1-one ("pentylone"); (vii)  4-fluoro-N-methylcathinone ("4-FMC"); (viii)  3-fluoro-N-methylcathinone ("3-FMC"); (ix)  1-(naphthalen-2-yl)-2- (pyrrolidin-1-yl) pentan-1-one ("naphyrone"); (x)  Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone ("α-PBP"); (xi)  1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino) -pentan-1-one (N-ethylpentylone, ephylone); (14)  a-PiHP 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one, also known as alpha-PiHP; and (15)  3MMC 2-methylamino)-1-3-methylphenyl)propan-1-one, also known as 3-methylmethcathinone. SECTION 3.  Section 41-29-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-115.  (a)  The controlled substances listed in this section, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, are included in Schedule II. SCHEDULE II (b)  Substances, vegetable origin or chemical synthesis.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in other schedules, any of the following substances, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis: (1)  Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, naldemedine, nalmefene, naloxegol, naloxone and naltrexone, but including the following: (i)  Codeine; (ii) Dihydroetorphine; (iii)  Ethylmorphine; (iv)  Etorphine hydrochloride; (v)  Granulated opium; (vi)  Hydrocodone, whether alone or in combination with any material, compound, mixture or preparation; (vii) Hydromorphone; (viii)  Metopon; (ix)  Morphine; (x)  Opium extracts; (xi)  Opium fluid extracts; (xii)  Oripavine; (xiii)  Oxycodone; (xiv)  Oxymorphone; (xv)  Powdered opium; (xvi)  Raw opium; (xvii)  Thebaine; (xviii)  Tincture of opium; (2)  Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in paragraph (1), but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium; (3)  Opium poppy and poppy straw; (4)  Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of cocaine or coca leaves, including cocaine and ecgonine and any salt, compound, derivative, isomer, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but not including: (i)  Decocainized coca leaves or extraction of coca leaves, which extractions do not contain cocaine or ecgonine; or (ii)  Ioflupane; (5)  Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy). (c)  Opiates.  Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specified chemical designation, dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene excepted: (1)  Alfentanil; (2)  Alphaprodine; (3)  Anileridine; (4)  Bezitramide; (5)  Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms); (6)  Carfentanil; (7)  Dihydrocodeine; (8)  Diphenoxylate; (9)  Fentanyl; (10)  Isomethadone; (11)  Levo-alphacetylmethadol (levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, LAAM); (12)  Levomethorphan; (13)  Levorphanol; (14)  Metazocine; (15)  Methadone; (16)  Methadone-intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4,4-diphenyl butane; (17)  Moramide-intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1,1-diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid; (18)  Oliceridine (N-[(3-methoxythiophen-2-yl)methyl]({2-[(9R)-9-(pyridin-2-yl)-6- oxaspiro[4.5]decan-9-yl]ethyl})amine); (19)  Pethidine (meperidine); (20)  Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine; (21)  Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate; (22)  Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid; (23)  Phenazocine; (24)  Piminodine; (25)  Racemethorphan; (26)  Racemorphan; (27)  Remifentanil; (28)  Sufentanil; (29)  Tapentadol; (30)  Thiafentanil, methyl 4-(2-methoxy-N-phenylacetamido)-1-(2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl) piperidine-4-carboxylate). (d)  Stimulants.  Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances: (1)  Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers; (2)  Phenmetrazine and its salts; (3)  Any substance which contains any quantity of methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; (4)  Methylphenidate and its salts; (5)  Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers and salts of isomers. (e)  Depressants. Unless specifically exempted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances: (1)  Amobarbital; (2)  Secobarbital; (3)  Pentobarbital; (4)  Glutethimide. (f)  Hallucinogenic substances. (1)  Dronabinol oral solution [(-)-delta-9-trans-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC)]; (2)  Nabilone [other names include:  (+/-)-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a- hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-9H-dibenzo(b,d)pyran-9-one]. (g)  Immediate precursors.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances: (1)  Amphetamine and methamphetamine immediate precursor:  Phenylacetone (other names include: phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; and methyl benzyl ketone); (2)  Phencyclidine immediate precursors: (i)  1-phenylcyclohexylamine; (ii)  1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC); (3)  Fentanyl immediate precursor:  4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP). (h)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of a Schedule II controlled substance and is listed as an exempt substance in 21 CFR, Section 1308.24 or 1308.32, shall be exempted from the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. SECTION 4.  Section 41-29-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-117.  (A)  The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule III. SCHEDULE III (a)  Stimulants. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, of the following substances: (1)  Benzphetamine; (2) Chlorphentermine; (3)  Clortermine; (4) Phendimetrazine. (b)  Depressants. Unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances: (1)  Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt of a derivative of barbituric acid, except those substances which are specifically listed in other schedules; (2)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following substances or any salt of the substances specifically included in this subsection (2) and one or more other active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any other schedule: (i) Amobarbital; (ii) Secobarbital; (iii) Pentobarbital; (3)  Any suppository dosage form containing any of the following substances or any salt of any of the substances specifically included in this subsection (3) approved by the Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository: (i) Amobarbital; (ii) Secobarbital; (iii) Pentobarbital; (4)  Chlorhexadol; (5)  Embutramide; (6)  Any drug product containing gamma-hydroxybutyric acid, including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers, for which an application is approved under Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act; (7)  Ketamine; its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; other names include (+)-2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)cyclohexanone; (8)  Lysergic acid; (9)  Lysergic acid amide; (10)  Methyprylon; (11)  Perampanel; its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; (12) Sulfondiethylmethane; (13) Sulfonethylmethane; (14) Sulfonmethane; (15)  Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof; other names for the tiletamine and zolazepam combination product include:  telazol; other names for tiletamine include: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone; other names for zolazepam include:  4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro 1,3, 8-trimethylpyrazolo-[3,4-e](1,4)-diazepin-7(1H)-one, flupyrazapon. (c)  Nalorphine. (d)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine, except for any product that contains any quantity of pseudoephedrine or ephedrine that is sold subject to the quantity restrictions authorized in Section 73-21-124. (e)  Narcotic drugs. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or any salts thereof: (1)  Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of codeine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium; (2)  Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of codeine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; (3)  Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of dihydrocodeine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; (4)  Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of ethylmorphine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; (5)  Not more than five hundred (500) milligrams of opium per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams, or not more than twenty-five (25) milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; (6)  Not more than fifty (50) milligrams of morphine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts. (f) Anabolic steroids.  Unless specifically exempted or listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of any of the following anabolic steroids (any drug or hormonal substance chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone other than estrogens, progestins, corticosteroids and dehydroepiandrosterone): (1)  3beta,17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane; (2)  3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane; (3)  5alpha-androstan-3,17-dione; (4)  1-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-ene); (5)  1-androstenediol (3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-ene); (6)  4-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene); (7)  5-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene); (8)  1-androstenedione ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3, 17-dione); (9)  4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione); (10)  5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione); (11)  Bolasterone (7alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (12)  Boldenone (17beta-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one); (13)  Boldione (androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione); (14)  Calusterone (7beta,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (15)  Clostebol (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (16)  Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxy-17alpha-methylandrost-1,4-dien-3-one); (17)  Desoxymethyltestosterone (17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androst-2-en-17beta-ol, also known as madol); (18)  Delta1-dihydrotestosterone (also known as 1-testosterone) (17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one); (19)  4-dihydrotestosterone (17beta-hydroxy-androstan-3-one); (20)  Drostanolone (17beta-hydroxy-2alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-3-one); (21)  Ethylestrenol (17alpha-ethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-ene); (22)  Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17alpha-methyl-11beta, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (23)  Formebolone (2-formyl-17alpha-methyl-11alpha,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-1, 4-dien-3-one); (24)  Furazabol (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan); (25)  13beta-ethyl-17alpha-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one; (26)  4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (27)  4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17beta-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one); (28)  Mestanolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one); (29)  Mesterolone (1alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-[5alpha]-androstan-3-one); (30)  Methandienone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one); (31)  Methandriol (17alpha-methyl-3beta, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene); (32) Methasterone (2[alpha], 17[alpha]-dimethyl-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol-3-one; (33)  Methenolone (1-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one); (34)  17alpha-methyl-3beta, 17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane; (35)  17alpha-methyl-3alpha, 17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane; (36)  17alpha-methyl-3beta, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene; (37)  17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxy-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one); (38) Methyldienolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one); (39) Methyltrienolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestra-4,9-11-trien-3-one); (40) Methyltestosterone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (41)  Mibolerone (7alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one); (42) 17alpha-methyl-Delta1-dihydrotestosterone (17b beta-hydroxy-17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one) (also known as 17-alpha-methyl-1-testosterone); (43)  Nandrolone (17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one); (44)  19-nor-4-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene); (45)  19-nor-4-androstenediol (3a,17beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene); (46)  19-nor-5-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyestr-5-ene); (47)  19-nor-5-androstenediol (3alpha,17beta-dihydroxyestr-5-ene); (48)  19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene3,17-dione, 19-norandrosta-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione); (49)  19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione); (50)  19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione); (51)  Norbolethone (13beta,17alpha-diethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one); (52)  Norclostebol (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one); (53) Norethandrolone (17alpha-ethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one); (54) Normethandrolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one); (55)  Oxandrolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5alpha]-androstan-3-one); (56)  Oxymesterone (17alpha-methyl-4,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (57)  Oxymetholone (17alpha-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17beta-hydroxy-[5alpha]- androstan-3-one); (58) Prostanozol (17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole) (59)  Stanozolol (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-[5alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]­- pyrazole); (60)  Stenbolone (17beta-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one); (61)  Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid lactone); (62)  Testosterone (17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one); (63) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13beta,17alpha-diethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one); (64)  Trenbolone (17beta-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one); (65)  Any salt, ester, or ether of a drug or substance described in this paragraph.  Except such term does not include an anabolic steroid that is expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and that has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services for such administration.  If any person prescribes, dispenses, or distributes such steroid for human use, the person shall be considered to have prescribed, dispensed or distributed an anabolic steroid within the meaning of this paragraph. (g)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of buprenorphine or its salts. (h)  Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States Food and Drug Administration approved drug product. (i)  Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of Tianeptine (7-((3-chloro-6-methyl-5,5-dioxido-6,11-dihydrodibenzo[c,f][1,2]thiazepin-11-yl)amino)heptanoic acid) or its salts, isomers, salts of isomers, sulfate, free acid or derivative thereof. (B)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of a Schedule III controlled substance other than butalbital, and is listed as an exempt substance in 21 CFR, Section 1308.22, 1308.24, 1308.26, 1308.32 or 1308.34, shall be exempted from the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. SECTION 5.  Section 41-29-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-119.  (A)  The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule IV. SCHEDULE IV (a)  Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains limited quantities of the following narcotic drugs, or any salts thereof: (1)  Not more than one (1) milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five (25) micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit; (2) Dextropropoxyphene, including its salts (Darvon, Darvon-N; also found in Darvon compound and Darvocet-N, etc.); (3)  2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical and geometric isomers and salts of these isomers (including tramadol). (b)  Depressants. Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances: (1)  Alfaxalone; (2)  Alprazolam; (3)  Barbital; (4)  Brexanolone; (5)  Bromazepam; (6)  Camazepam; (7)  Carisoprodol; (8)  Chloral betaine; (9)  Chloral hydrate; (10) Chlordiazepoxide and its salts, but does not include chlordiazepoxide hydrochloride and clidinium bromide or chlordiazepoxide and esterified estrogens; (11)  Clobazam; (12)  Clonazepam; (13)  Clorazepate; (14)  Clotiazepam; (15)  Cloxazolam; (16)  Daridorexant ([(S)-2-(5-chloro-4-methyl-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-yl)-2- methylpyrrolidin-1-yl](5-methoxy-2-(2H-1,2,3-triazol-2- yl)phenyl)methanone), including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; (17)  Delorazepam; (18)  Diazepam; (19) Dichloralphenazone; (20)  Estazolam; (21) Ethchlorvynol; (22)  Ethinamate; (23)  Ethyl loflazepate; (24)  Fludiazepam; (25) Flunitrazepam; (26)  Flurazepam; (27)  Fospropofol; (28)  Halazepam; (29)  Haloxazolam; (30)  Ketazolam; (31)  Lemborexant; (32)  Loprazolam; (33)  Lorazepam; (34)  Lormetazepam; (35)  Mebutamate; (36)  Medazepam; (37)  Meprobamate; (38)  Methohexital; (39) Methylphenobarbital; (40)  Midazolam; (41)  Nimetazepam; (42)  Nitrazepam; (43)  Nordiazepam; (44)  Oxazepam; (45)  Oxazolam; (46)  Paraldehyde; (47)  Petrichloral; (48)  Phenobarbital; (49)  Pinazepam; (50)  Prazepam; (51)  Quazepam; (52)  Remimazolam; (53)  Suvorexant; (54)  Temazepam; (55)  Tetrazepam; (56)  Triazolam; (57)  Zaleplon; (58)  Zolpidem; (59)  Zopiclone. (c)  [Deleted] (d)  Lorcaserin. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of Lorcaserin, including its salts, isomers, and salts of such isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible. (e)  Stimulants. Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances: (1)  Cathine ((+/-) Norpseudoephedrine); (2) Diethylpropion; (3)  Fencamfamin; (4)  Fenproporex; (5)  Mazindol; (6)  Mefenorex; (7)  Modafinil; (8)  Pemoline (including any organometallic complexes and chelates thereof); (9)  Phentermine; (10)  Pipradrol; (11)  Serdexmethylphenidate; (12)  Sibutramine; (13)  Solriamfetol; (14)  SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane). (f)  Other substances. (1) Pentazocine; (2)  Butorphanol (including its optical isomers); (3) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid); (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; (4)  Zuranolone and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. (B)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of a Schedule IV controlled substance and is listed as an exempt substance in 21 CFR, Section 1308.22, 1308.24, 1308.26, 1308.32 or 1308.34, shall be exempted from the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. SECTION 6.  Section 41-29-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-121. SCHEDULE V (a)  Schedule V consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section. (b)  Narcotic drugs. [Reserved] (c)  Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients.  Any compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below, which also contains one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone: (1)  Not more than two hundred (200) milligrams of codeine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams; (2)  Not more than one hundred (100) milligrams of dihydrocodeine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams; (3)  Not more than one hundred (100) milligrams of ethylmorphine, or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams; (4)  Not more than two and five-tenths (2.5) milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than twenty-five (25) micrograms of atropine sulphate per dosage unit; (5)  Not more than one hundred (100) milligrams of opium per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams; (6)  Not more than five-tenths (0.5) milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five (25) micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit. (d)  Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substance, including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers:  Pyrovalerone. (e)  Depressants.  Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers and salts of isomers: (1) Brivaracetam ((2S)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl] butanamide) (also referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact); (2)  Cenobamate ([(1R)-1-2-chlorophenyl)-2-tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl] carbamate; 2H-tetrazole-2-ethanol, alpha-(2-chlorophenyl)-, carbamate (ester), (alphaR)-; carbamic acid (R)-(+)-1-(2-chlorophenyl) -2-(2H-tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl ester); (3) Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4-(4- fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl ester]; (4) Ganaxolone (3a-hydroxy-3b-methyl-5a-pregnan-20-one); (5)  Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide]; (6)  Lasmiditan [2,4,6-trifluoro-N-(6- (1-methylpiperidine-4-carbonyl)pyridine-2-yl-benzamide]; (7)  Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid]. (f)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of a Schedule V controlled substance and is listed as an exempt substance in 21 CFR, Section 1308.22, 1308.24, 1308.26, 1308.32 or 1308.34, shall be exempted from the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.